src/fst/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!****************************************************************************
!! # CONJUNCTIONS
!!
!!  E. Uí Dhonnchadha
!!  - New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers, etc.
!!
!! removed items (subbord conjs) which are pre-verbal (which often have past tense inflection)
!! e.g. go/gur a/ar nach/nár 
!! and which often follow (or attach to) a conjunction
!! e.g. cé go, nuair nach, 
!! remaining subordinating conjunctions can be followed by verb or copula 
!! go mb'fhusa an obair ..., go dtógfadh sé
!! e.g. má bhíonn, más
!! some still have tense marking as they are combined forms
!! e.g. sula, sular, murar etc.
!****************************************************************************
LEXICON Conjunctions
!! ### LEXICON @LEXNAME@

!!agus+Conj+Coord:is		# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**
!!agus+Conj+Coord:'s		# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**
!!agus+Conj+Coord:a's		# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**
!!agus+Conj+Coord:agus	# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**
!!ná+Conj+Coord:ná		# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**, cf ní ... ná
!!ná+Conj+Subord:ná		# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**
!!nó+Conj+Coord:nó		# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**
!!nó+Conj+Coord:no		# ; !!≈ - **@LEMMA@**

agus+Conj+Coord+NG:is		#;
agus+Conj+Coord+NG:'s		#;
agus+Conj+Coord+NG:a's		#;
agus+Conj+Coord:agus		#;
ná+Conj+Coord:ná			#; !!! ní ... ná
ná+Conj+Subord:ná			#;
nó+Conj+Coord:nó			#;
nó+Conj+Coord+NG:no			#;
!!!cé+Conj+Coord:cé			#;  ! also with copula see NIG p113
!!!ach+Conj+Coord:ach			#;  ! NOT USUALLY CO-ORD?????

!!nár+Conj+Subord:nár			#;
má+Conj+Subord:má			#;
mura+Conj+Subord:mura		#;
muna+Conj+Subord:muna		#;
mara+Conj+Subord:mara		#;
murach+Conj+Subord:murach	#;
sula+Conj+Subord:sula		#;
sula+Conj+Subord+NG:sul		#;
sula+Conj+Subord+Len:shul	#; 	! Hartmann
sara+Conj+Subord:sara		#; ! sara tháinig sé ...

arae+Conj+Subord:arae		#;
chomh_fada_agus+Conj+Subord:chúns	#;
chomh_fada_is+Conj+Subord:chúns	#; ! (Added CW 09/08)
mar+Conj+Subord:mar			#;
mar_aon+Conj+Subord:maraon		#;
ach+Conj+Subord:ach			#;
dá+Conj+Subord:dá			#;
go+Conj+Subord:go			#;	! SEE ALSO PART-LEX.TXT
nach+Conj+Subord:nach			#;	! SEE ALSO PART-LEX.TXT
!! gur NOT moved to Verb Part as a)always precede a verb b) have tense c) preceded by conjs like nuair, cé - SHOULD BE REMOVED I THINK ???? NO NEED FOT CONJ AS WELL AS SUBORD COP AND SUBORD VERB PART ...
!!!!gur+Conj+Subord:gur		#;  ! COPULA FORM SEE V3-LEX.TXT & PART-LEX.TXT
nuair+Conj+Subord:nuair		#;
fad+Conj+Subord:fad		#;
toisc+Conj+Subord:toisc		#;
!!ráite+Conj+Subord:ráite		#;
óir+Conj+Subord:óir			#;
cé+Conj+Subord:cé			#;
cé+Conj+Subord+NG:gigh			#; ! = cé (conj)
ó+Conj+Subord:ó				#;
ó+Conj+Subord:Ó				#;
ainneoin+Conj+Subord:ainneoin		#;
aindeoin+Conj+Subord+NG:aindeoin		#;

mura+Conj+Subord+Past:murar		#;
muna+Conj+Subord+Past:munar		#;
sula+Conj+Subord+Past:sular		#; ! sular tháinig sé ...

má+Conj+Subord+Cop:más			#;
ó+Conj+Subord+Cop:ós			#;
mura+Conj+Subord+Cop+Past:murar		#;
mura+Conj+Subord+Cop+Past:murarbh	#; ! before vowel
mura+Conj+Subord+Cop+Past+NG:murab		#; ! before vowel
sula+Conj+Subord+Cop+Past:sular		#;
sula+Conj+Subord+Cop+Past:sularbh	#; ! before vowel
dar+Conj+Subord+Cop:dar			#;
dar+Conj+Subord+Cop:darb		#; ! before vowel
dar+Conj+Subord+Cop+Past:darbh		#; ! before vowel

!!<c é %_:%  i s %_:%  m o i t e %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>	#;
!!<c é %_:%  i s %_:%  m ó i t e %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>	#;
!!<c é s %_:%  m ó i t e %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>		#;
!!<c é s %_:%  m o i t e %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>		#;
!!<d e %_:%  r é i r %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>		#;

!!!<s e a c h a s %_:%  g o  %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>	#; ! NOT seachas go poiblí
<c h u n %_:%  g o  %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>		#;
<l e %_:%  g o  %+Conj:0 %+Subord:0>			#;

!cér	#;
!cérbh	#;

trá+Conj:trá	#; ! (Added CW 09/08) Lit: Then, indeed
trá+Conj+NG:tra	#; ! (Added CW 09/08) Lit: Then, indeed
